Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.080

Orders.

An order pursuant to proceedings authorized by this chapter, after due notice and findings in accordance with this chapter and chapter 34.05 RCW, or an order of summary suspension entered under this chapter, takes effect immediately upon its being served. The final order, if appealed to the court, may not be stayed pending the appeal unless the disciplinary authority or court to which the appeal is taken enters an order staying the order of the disciplinary authority, which stay shall provide for terms necessary to protect the public.

[ 2007 c 256 s 15; 2002 c 86 s 109.]